District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.72

False information or forged signature in accident report; forged evidence of proof of financial responsibility; false swearing.

Repealed.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 138, ch. 222, § 72
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 957, Pub. L. 85-792, § 13
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155, § 14(e), 29 DCR 3491

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-472.
1973 Ed., § 40-488.